Louisiana, session 2026, SB359.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1053(GG) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1053. Commission; qualification of members; appointment; vacancies;
compensation; removal of commissioners; certain powers
* * *
GG. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, at the
expiration of the terms of office of the commissioners serving on August 1, 2026,
of a hospital service district in a parish having a population in excess of twenty-
five thousand but not more than twenty-six thousand persons based on the latest
federal decennial census, the successors shall be appointed for a term of four
years in the same manner as the predecessor appointees were selected, and no
commissioner shall serve for more than two consecutive four year terms.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.